Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.096

Law enforcement officers—Dual membership—Plan 1 exception.

(1) An employee who was a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 on or before January 1, 2003, and on July 27, 2003, is employed by the department of fish and wildlife as a law enforcement officer as defined in RCW 41.26.030, shall become a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. All officers will be dual members as provided in chapter 41.54 RCW, and public employees' retirement system service credit may not be transferred to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

(2) An employee who was a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on or before January 1, 2003, and on or after July 27, 2003, is employed by the department of fish and wildlife as a law enforcement officer as defined in RCW 41.26.030, shall remain a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

[ 2003 c 388 s 1.]